Colorado, session 2026A, SB125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 29.5 to title
22 as follows:
ARTICLE 29.5
Disability Rights Protections in Public Elementary and Secondary
Schools
22-29.5-101. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(a) SECTION 2 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION REQUIRES
THE STATE TO MAINTAIN A THOROUGH AND UNIFORM SYSTEM OF FREE
PUBLIC SCHOOLS THAT SERVES ALL CHILDREN IN COLORADO, INCLUDING
STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES;
(b) ENSURING EQUAL ACCESS TO EDUCATIONAL PROGRAMS,
SERVICES, AND ACTIVITIES IS ESSENTIAL TO FULFILLING THIS
CONSTITUTIONAL MANDATE, ADVANCING THE STATE'S LONGSTANDING
COMMITMENT TO EDUCATIONAL EQUITY AND NONDISCRIMINATION,
PROMOTING ACADEMIC ACHIEVEMENT AMONG STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES,
AND CLOSING OPPORTUNITY GAPS;
(c) COLORADO HAS A STRONG CONSTITUTIONAL TRADITION OF
PROTECTING INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS AS SET FORTH IN ARTICLE 2 OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION, INCLUDING THE GUARANTEES OF EQUALITY OF RIGHTS, DUE
PROCESS OF LAW, AND SECURITY OF PERSONS;
(d) STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES HAVE HISTORICALLY RELIED ON
FEDERAL CIVIL RIGHTS LAWS, INCLUDING SECTION 504 OF THE FEDERAL
"REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973" AND TITLE II OF THE FEDERAL "AMERICANS
WITH DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", TO SAFEGUARD THEIR ACCESS TO
EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES AND PROTECT THEMSELVES FROM
DISCRIMINATION;
(e) INCORPORATING CORE PROTECTIONS OF THESE FEDERAL LAWS
INTO STATE STATUTE STRENGTHENS COLORADO'S ENFORCEMENT
FRAMEWORK, ENSURES CONTINUITY OF RIGHTS REGARDLESS OF CHANGES TO
FEDERAL ENFORCEMENT PRIORITIES, AND PROMOTES CLARITY AND
CONSISTENCY FOR STUDENTS, FAMILIES, AND LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS;
(f) IT IS IN THE INTEREST OF THE STATE TO CODIFY FEDERAL
DISABILITY-BASED NONDISCRIMINATION REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO
PUBLIC ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION, TO AFFIRM THE RIGHT
OF EACH QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY TO A FREE APPROPRIATE
PUBLIC EDUCATION, AND TO ESTABLISH CLEAR OBLIGATIONS FOR LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDERS CONCERNING IDENTIFICATION, EVALUATION,
EDUCATIONAL PLACEMENT, REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS, EFFECTIVE
COMMUNICATION, PHYSICAL ACCESSIBILITY, AND PROTECTIONS AGAINST
HARASSMENT AND RETALIATION; AND
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-125

(g) PROVIDING STATE-LEVEL REMEDIES, OVERSIGHT, AND
ENFORCEMENT MECHANISMS, INCLUDING A UNIFORM COMPLAINT PROCESS
ADMINISTERED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION, COMPLEMENTS
FEDERAL SAFEGUARDS, PROMOTES TIMELY AND LOCAL RESOLUTION OF
CONCERNS, AND ENSURES THAT STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES HAVE
RELIABLE AND ACCESSIBLE AVENUES FOR ADDRESSING VIOLATIONS OF THEIR
RIGHTS.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND DECLARES THAT
THE PURPOSE OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5 IS TO:
(a) UPHOLD THE STATE'S CONSTITUTIONAL OBLIGATION TO PROVIDE
A THOROUGH AND UNIFORM SYSTEM OF FREE PUBLIC SCHOOLS;
(b) AFFIRM THE STATE'S COMMITMENT TO EQUAL EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITY AND NONDISCRIMINATION FOR STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES;
(c) ENSURE THAT PUBLIC SCHOOLS PROVIDE QUALIFIED STUDENTS
WITH DISABILITIES WITH THE AIDS, BENEFITS, SERVICES, AND OPPORTUNITIES
NECESSARY TO PARTICIPATE FULLY AND MEANINGFULLY IN EDUCATIONAL
PROGRAMS;
(d) CREATE CLEAR, CONSISTENT STATEWIDE STANDARDS AND
PROCEDURES THAT ALIGN WITH FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS WHILE PROVIDING
INDEPENDENT STATE PROTECTIONS; AND
(e) ENSURE THAT ALL STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES IN THE STATE
ARE EDUCATED IN ENVIRONMENTS THAT RESPECT THEIR DIGNITY,
INDEPENDENCE, AND RIGHT TO PARTICIPATE FULLY IN THE LIFE OF THEIR
SCHOOLS AND COMMUNITIES.
22-29.5-102. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 29.5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT" OR "ADA" MEANS THE
FEDERAL "AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", 42 U.S.C. SEC.
12101 ET SEQ.
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-125

(2) "APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION" MEANS THE PROVISION OF
PUBLIC EDUCATION AND RELATED AIDS AND SERVICES THAT ARE DESIGNED
TO MEET THE INDIVIDUAL EDUCATIONAL NEEDS OF A QUALIFIED STUDENT
WITH A DISABILITY AS ADEQUATELY AS THE NEEDS OF A STUDENT WITHOUT
A DISABILITY AND ARE BASED ON ADHERENCE TO PROCEDURES THAT SATISFY
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5.
(3) "DAYS" MEANS CALENDAR DAYS.
(4) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
CREATED AND EXISTING PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-1-115.
(5) "DISABILITY" MEANS A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL IMPAIRMENT THAT
SUBSTANTIALLY LIMITS ONE OR MORE MAJOR LIFE ACTIVITIES, A RECORD OF
SUCH AN IMPAIRMENT, OR BEING REGARDED AS HAVING SUCH AN
IMPAIRMENT.
(6) "FACILITIES" MEANS ALL OR ANY PORTION OF BUILDINGS,
STRUCTURES, EQUIPMENT, ROADS, WALKS, PARKING LOTS, OR OTHER REAL
OR PERSONAL PROPERTY OR INTERESTS IN SUCH PROPERTY.
(7) "FREE EDUCATION" MEANS THE PROVISION OF EDUCATIONAL AND
RELATED SERVICES WITHOUT COST TO A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY OR TO THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR GUARDIAN, EXCEPT FOR THE
FEES THAT ARE IMPOSED ON STUDENTS WITHOUT A DISABILITY OR THEIR
PARENT OR GUARDIAN. A FREE EDUCATION MAY CONSIST OF EITHER THE
PROVISION OF FREE SERVICES THROUGH A PROGRAM OPERATED BY A LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER OR THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER PLACING A
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY OR REFERRING THE STUDENT FOR AID,
BENEFITS, OR SERVICES NOT OPERATED OR PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER AS ITS MEANS OF CARRYING OUT THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5 FOR PAYMENT OF THE COSTS OF THE AID, BENEFITS, OR
SERVICES. FUNDS AVAILABLE FROM ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE AGENCY MAY
BE USED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5. NOTHING IN
THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUCTED TO RELIEVE AN INSURER OR SIMILAR
THIRD PARTY FROM AN OTHERWISE VALID OBLIGATION TO PROVIDE OR PAY
FOR SERVICES TO A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY.
(8) "INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM" OR "IEP" HAS THE
MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 22-20-103 (15).
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-125

(9) "INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT" OR "IDEA"
MEANS THE FEDERAL "INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT",
20 U.S.C. SEC. 1400 ET SEQ.
(10) "LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER" MEANS A SCHOOL DISTRICT, A
CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED BY A SCHOOL DISTRICT PURSUANT TO PART
1 OF ARTICLE 30.5 OF THIS TITLE 22, A CHARTER SCHOOL AUTHORIZED BY
THE STATE CHARTER SCHOOL INSTITUTE PURSUANT TO PART 5 OF ARTICLE
30.5 OF THIS TITLE 22, THE STATE CHARTER SCHOOL INSTITUTE ESTABLISHED
IN SECTION 22-30.5-503, A STATE-OPERATED PROGRAM, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 22-20-103, OR A BOARD OF COOPERATIVE SERVICES CREATED AND
OPERATING PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 5 OF THIS TITLE 22 THAT OPERATES ONE
OR MORE PUBLIC SCHOOLS; EXCEPT THAT, FOR MATTERS INVOLVING THE
PROVISION OF A FREE EDUCATION TO A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY, "LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS
"ADMINISTRATIVE UNIT" AS DEFINED IN SECTION 22-20-103 (1) FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5.
(11) "PARENT" HAS THE MEANING IN SECTION 22-20-103 (19.7).
(12) "QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY" MEANS A STUDENT
WHO HAS A DISABILITY AND WHO IS ENTITLED TO A FREE PUBLIC EDUCATION
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-33-103.
(13) "SECTION 504" MEANS SECTION 504 OF THE FEDERAL
"REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973", 29 U.S.C. SEC. 794 ET SEQ.
(14) "SECTION 504 PLAN" MEANS A PLAN MADE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 504 THAT PROVIDES ACCOMMODATIONS, SERVICES, AND OTHER
SUPPORT FOR A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY.
22-29.5-103. Discrimination prohibited.
(1) NO QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY SHALL, ON THE BASIS
OF DISABILITY, BE EXCLUDED FROM PARTICIPATION IN, DENIED THE BENEFITS
OF, OR OTHERWISE SUBJECTED TO DISCRIMINATION UNDER ANY PROGRAM,
SERVICE, OR ACTIVITY BY A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
(2) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER, IN PROVIDING ANY AID, BENEFIT,
OR SERVICE, MAY NOT, DIRECTLY OR THROUGH CONTRACTUAL, LICENSING,
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-125

OR OTHER ARRANGEMENTS, BASED ON DISABILITY:
(a) DENY A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY THE
OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN OR BENEFIT FROM THE AID, BENEFIT, OR
SERVICE;
(b) AFFORD A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY AN
OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN OR BENEFIT FROM THE AID, BENEFIT, OR
SERVICE THAT IS NOT EQUAL TO THAT AFFORDED TO OTHERS;
(c) PROVIDE A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY WITH AN AID,
BENEFIT, OR SERVICE THAT IS NOT AS EFFECTIVE AS THAT PROVIDED TO
OTHERS;
(d) PROVIDE DIFFERENT OR SEPARATE AIDS, BENEFITS, OR SERVICES
TO A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY OR TO ANY CLASS OF QUALIFIED
STUDENTS WITH A DISABILITY UNLESS SUCH ACTION IS NECESSARY TO
PROVIDE A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY WITH AIDS, BENEFITS, OR
SERVICES THAT ARE AS EFFECTIVE AS THOSE PROVIDED TO OTHERS;
(e) AID OR PERPETUATE DISCRIMINATION AGAINST A QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY BY PROVIDING SIGNIFICANT ASSISTANCE TO AN
AGENCY, ORGANIZATION, OR PERSON THAT DISCRIMINATES ON THE BASIS OF
DISABILITY IN PROVIDING ANY AID, BENEFIT, OR SERVICE TO BENEFICIARIES
OF THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM OR
ACTIVITY; OR
(f) OTHERWISE LIMIT A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IN
THE ENJOYMENT OF ANY RIGHT, PRIVILEGE, ADVANTAGE, OR OPPORTUNITY
ENJOYED BY OTHERS RECEIVING AN EDUCATIONAL AID, BENEFIT, OR SERVICE.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5, AN AID, BENEFIT, OR
SERVICE, TO BE EQUALLY EFFECTIVE, IS NOT REQUIRED TO PRODUCE THE
IDENTICAL RESULT OR LEVEL OF ACHIEVEMENT FOR QUALIFIED STUDENTS
WITH A DISABILITY AND STUDENTS WITHOUT A DISABILITY, BUT MUST
AFFORD A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY EQUAL OPPORTUNITY TO
OBTAIN THE SAME RESULT, TO GAIN THE SAME BENEFIT, OR TO REACH THE
SAME LEVEL OF ACHIEVEMENT IN THE MOST INTEGRATED SETTING
APPROPRIATE TO THE STUDENT'S NEEDS.
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-125

(4) DESPITE THE EXISTENCE OF SEPARATE OR DIFFERENT AIDS,
BENEFITS, OR SERVICES PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS TITLE 22, A
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY NOT DENY A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH
A DISABILITY THE OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN SUCH AIDS, BENEFITS, OR
SERVICES THAT ARE NOT SEPARATE OR DIFFERENT.
(5) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL NOT, DIRECTLY OR
THROUGH CONTRACTUAL OR OTHER ARRANGEMENTS, USE CRITERIA OR
METHODS OF ADMINISTRATION THAT:
(a) HAVE THE EFFECT OF SUBJECTING A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY TO DISCRIMINATION ON THE BASIS OF THEIR DISABILITY;
(b) HAVE THE PURPOSE OR EFFECT OF DEFEATING OR SUBSTANTIALLY
IMPAIRING THE ACCOMPLISHMENT OF THE OBJECTIVES OF THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER'S PROGRAM OR ACTIVITY WITH RESPECT TO A
QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY; OR
(c) PERPETUATE THE DISCRIMINATION OF ANOTHER LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER IF BOTH LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS ARE SUBJECT
TO COMMON ADMINISTRATIVE CONTROL OR ARE AGENCIES OF THE STATE.
(6) IN DETERMINING THE SITE OR LOCATION OF A FACILITY, A LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL NOT MAKE SELECTIONS THAT:
(a) HAVE THE EFFECT OF EXCLUDING A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY FROM A FACILITY OR DENYING A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY THE BENEFITS OF A FACILITY, OR OTHERWISE SUBJECTING A
QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY TO DISCRIMINATION; OR
(b) HAVE THE PURPOSE OR EFFECT OF DEFEATING OR SUBSTANTIALLY
IMPAIRING THE ACCOMPLISHMENT OF THE OBJECTIVES OF THE PROGRAM OR
ACTIVITY WITH RESPECT TO A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY.
(7) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL CONDUCT EVALUATIONS
AND REEVALUATIONS OF A STUDENT IN THE STUDENT'S PRIMARY LANGUAGE.
A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL COMMUNICATE WITH A PARENT WITH
LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY IN A MANNER THAT PROVIDES THE PARENT
WITH MEANINGFUL ACCESS TO INFORMATION THAT IS PROVIDED TO OTHER
PARENTS, INCLUDING INFORMATION ABOUT PROGRAMS, SERVICES, AND
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-125

ACTIVITIES.
22-29.5-104. Grievance process - coordinator - training.
(1) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL:
(a) ADOPT A GRIEVANCE PROCESS THAT INCORPORATES APPROPRIATE
DUE PROCESS STANDARDS AND PROVIDES FOR THE PROMPT AND EQUITABLE
RESOLUTION OF COMPLAINTS ALLEGING ANY ACTION PROHIBITED BY SECTION
504, WHICH MAY BE SATISFIED BY ADOPTING A SECTION 504 GRIEVANCE
PROCESS THAT FULFILLS THE REQUIREMENTS OF 34 CFR 104.7. THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER IS NOT REQUIRED TO APPLY ITS GRIEVANCE
PROCEDURE TO ALLEGATIONS RELATED TO THE IDENTIFICATION,
EVALUATION, PLACEMENT, OR PROVISION OF FREE EDUCATION PURSUANT TO
AN IEP.
(b) DESIGNATE AT LEAST ONE RESPONSIBLE EMPLOYEE TO OVERSEE
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 29.5 AND SERVE AS A POINT OF CONTACT
FOR STUDENTS, PARENTS, THE DEPARTMENT, AND THIRD PARTIES SUBJECT TO
THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE RESPONSIBLE EMPLOYEE MUST RECEIVE TRAINING ABOUT
HOW TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5, INCLUDING
CREATING INCLUSIVE AND RESPECTFUL ENVIRONMENTS FOR STUDENTS WITH
DISABILITIES, DISABILITY RIGHTS, AND THE DISABILITY RIGHTS GRIEVANCE
PROCESS WITHIN SIXTY DAYS OF BEING DESIGNATED;
(II) IN ADDITION TO OVERSEEING COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE
29.5 AND SERVING AS A POINT OF CONTACT FOR STUDENTS, PARENTS, AND
THIRD PARTIES WHO HAVE QUESTIONS OR CONCERNS ABOUT THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5, THE RESPONSIBLE EMPLOYEE MAY
ALSO SERVE AS THE RESPONSIBLE EMPLOYEE REQUIRED BY 34 CFR 104.7 (a);
AND
(III) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE THE
RESPONSIBLE EMPLOYEE WITH THE NECESSARY TIME, RESOURCES, AND
AUTHORITY TO FULFILL THE OBLIGATIONS SET FORTH IN THIS ARTICLE 29.5;
(c) PROVIDE INITIAL AND CONTINUING NOTIFICATION TO STUDENTS
AND PARENTS THAT THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MUST NOT
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-125

DISCRIMINATE ON THE BASIS OF DISABILITY. THE NOTIFICATION SHALL
INCLUDE THE NAME, TITLE, PHONE NUMBER, AND EMAIL ADDRESS OF THE
RESPONSIBLE EMPLOYEE DESIGNATED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF
THIS SECTION. A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE THE INITIAL
NOTIFICATION REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION (1)(c) ON OR BEFORE APRIL
1, 2027. METHODS OF INITIAL AND CONTINUING NOTIFICATION INCLUDE THE
PUBLIC POSTING OF HARD-COPY NOTICES IN SCHOOLS AND IN THE CENTRAL
OFFICE BUILDING OF A SCHOOL; INCLUSION IN STUDENT AND EMPLOYEE
HANDBOOKS; INCLUSION IN NEWSLETTERS, MASS EMAILS, AND INFORMATION
SENT HOME TO PARENTS; PLACEMENT OF NOTICES IN THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER'S PUBLICATIONS AND ONLINE MATERIALS, INCLUDING THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER'S WEBSITE AND SOCIAL MEDIA; OR DISTRIBUTION OF
MEMORANDA OR OTHER WRITTEN COMMUNICATIONS. THIS NOTICE
REQUIREMENT MAY BE MET IN CONJUNCTION WITH ANY NOTICE REQUIRED BY
34 CFR 104.8, OR 28 CFR 35.106.
(d) TRAIN RELEVANT STAFF ANNUALLY ABOUT THE ESSENTIAL
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION,
"RELEVANT STAFF" INCLUDES THE EMPLOYEE DESIGNATED PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION, AT LEAST ONE ADMINISTRATOR OR DESIGNEE FROM EACH
EDUCATIONAL BUILDING ON THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S PREMISES,
AND AT LEAST ONE OTHER STAFF REGULARLY INVOLVED WITH DEVELOPING,
IMPLEMENTING, AND COORDINATING PLANS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
ARTICLE 29.5. IF A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER HAS A BUILDING-SPECIFIC
COORDINATOR RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 504 AND THIS
ARTICLE 29.5, THAT INDIVIDUAL MAY ATTEND THE TRAINING INSTEAD OF A
BUILDING ADMINISTRATOR.
22-29.5-105. Reasonable accommodations.
(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, A
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL MAKE A REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION
TO A POLICY, PRACTICE, OR PROCEDURE WHEN THE ACCOMMODATION IS
NECESSARY TO AVOID DISCRIMINATING AGAINST A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH
A DISABILITY ON THE BASIS OF DISABILITY, UNLESS THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER CAN DEMONSTRATE THAT MAKING THE REASONABLE
ACCOMMODATION WOULD FUNDAMENTALLY ALTER THE NATURE OF THE
SERVICE, PROGRAM, OR ACTIVITY COVERED BY THE POLICY, PRACTICE, OR
PROCEDURE, OR CAUSE AN UNDUE FINANCIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE BURDEN
ON THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-125

(2) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER IS NOT REQUIRED TO MAKE A
REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION TO A POLICY, PRACTICE, OR PROCEDURE TO
AVOID DISCRIMINATING AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ONLY REGARDED AS
HAVING A DISABILITY PURSUANT TO THE ADA.
(3) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE REASONABLE
ACCOMMODATIONS TO A PARENT WITH A DISABILITY, INCLUDING A
COMMUNICATION-RELATED DISABILITY, WHO IS SEEKING APPROPRIATE
ACCESS TO PROGRAMS OR ACTIVITIES FOR PARENTS IN RELATION TO THAT
PARENT'S CHILD. COMMUNICATION-RELATED DISABILITY ACCOMMODATIONS
MUST BE CONSISTENT WITH THE STANDARDS STATED IN SECTION
22-29.5-106.
(4) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MUST PROVIDE INTERPRETATION
AND TRANSLATION SERVICES FOR COMMUNICATION WITH A PARENT WITH
LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY.
22-29.5-106. Effective communication.
(1) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ENSURE THAT
COMMUNICATION WITH A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IS AS
EFFECTIVE AS COMMUNICATION WITH A STUDENT WITHOUT A DISABILITY.
(2) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL FURNISH APPROPRIATE
AUXILIARY AIDS AND SERVICES WHERE NECESSARY TO AFFORD A QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN
AND ENJOY THE BENEFITS OF A SERVICE, PROGRAM, OR ACTIVITY OF THE
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
(3) THE TYPE OF AUXILIARY AID OR SERVICE NECESSARY TO ENSURE
EFFECTIVE COMMUNICATION WITH A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY
MAY VARY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE:
(a) METHOD OF COMMUNICATION USED BY THE QUALIFIED STUDENT
WITH A DISABILITY;
(b) NATURE, LENGTH, AND COMPLEXITY OF THE INVOLVED
COMMUNICATION; AND
(c) CONTEXT IN WHICH THE COMMUNICATION IS TAKING PLACE.
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-125

(4) IN DETERMINING WHAT TYPES OF AUXILIARY AIDS AND SERVICES
ARE NECESSARY TO ENSURE EFFECTIVE COMMUNICATION WITH A QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY, A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL GIVE
PRIMARY CONSIDERATION TO THE REQUEST OF OR ON BEHALF OF A
QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY. TO BE EFFECTIVE, AN AUXILIARY
AID OR SERVICE MUST BE PROVIDED IN A FORMAT THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO A
QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY, IN A TIMELY MANNER, AND IN SUCH
A WAY AS TO PROTECT THE PRIVACY AND INDEPENDENCE OF THE QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY.
(5) (a) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL NOT REQUIRE A
QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY TO PROVIDE AN INTERPRETER.
(b) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL NOT RELY ON AN ADULT
ACCOMPANYING A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY TO INTERPRET OR
FACILITATE COMMUNICATION, EXCEPT:
(I) IN AN EMERGENCY INVOLVING AN IMMINENT THREAT TO THE
SAFETY OR WELFARE OF AN INDIVIDUAL OR THE PUBLIC AND NO INTERPRETER
IS AVAILABLE; OR
(II) WHEN THE QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY SPECIFICALLY
REQUESTS THAT THE ACCOMPANYING ADULT INTERPRET OR FACILITATE
COMMUNICATION, THE ACCOMPANYING ADULT AGREES TO PROVIDE SUCH
ASSISTANCE, AND RELIANCE ON THAT ADULT FOR SUCH ASSISTANCE IS
APPROPRIATE UNDER THE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(c) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL NOT RELY ON A MINOR TO
INTERPRET OR FACILITATE COMMUNICATION, EXCEPT IN AN EMERGENCY
INVOLVING AN IMMINENT THREAT TO THE SAFETY OR WELFARE OF AN
INDIVIDUAL OR THE PUBLIC AND NO INTERPRETER IS AVAILABLE.
22-29.5-107. Physical accessibility - definition.
NO QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY MAY BE DENIED THE
BENEFITS OF, BE EXCLUDED FROM PARTICIPATION IN, OR OTHERWISE BE
SUBJECTED TO DISCRIMINATION UNDER A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S
PROGRAMS OR ACTIVITIES BECAUSE THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S
FACILITIES ARE INACCESSIBLE TO OR CANNOT BE ACCESSED SAFELY BY
PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES. IN IMPLEMENTING THIS SECTION, LOCAL
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-125

EDUCATION PROVIDERS MAY REFER TO THE SECTION 504 REGULATIONS AT
SUBPART C, THE ADA REGULATIONS AT SUBPART D, AND ACCESSIBILITY
STANDARDS SUCH AS THE UNIFORM FEDERAL ACCESSIBILITY STANDARDS,
THE 1991 ADA STANDARDS FOR ACCESSIBLE DESIGN, AND THE 2010 ADA
STANDARDS FOR ACCESSIBLE DESIGN.
22-29.5-108. Free and appropriate public education.
(1) (a) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE A FREE AND
APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION TO EACH QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY WHO IS IN THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S JURISDICTION,
REGARDLESS OF THE NATURE OR SEVERITY OF THE STUDENT'S DISABILITY.
(b) IMPLEMENTATION OF AN IEP DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE IDEA IS ONE WAY OF MEETING THE INDIVIDUAL EDUCATIONAL NEEDS
OF A STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY AS ADEQUATELY AS THE NEEDS OF A
STUDENT WITHOUT A DISABILITY ARE MET.
(2) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ENSURE THAT A QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY WITHIN THAT LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S
JURISDICTION RECEIVES AN APPROPRIATE EDUCATION EVEN IF THE STUDENT
IS PLACED OR REFERRED TO A PROGRAM, AID, BENEFIT, OR SERVICE OTHER
THAN ONE OPERATED BY THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
(3) A FREE EDUCATION MAY CONSIST OF EITHER THE PROVISION OF
FREE SERVICES OR PAYMENT TO A THIRD PARTY IF THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER PLACES A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IN A PROGRAM
OTHER THAN ONE OPERATED BY THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
(4) IF A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER PLACES A QUALIFIED STUDENT
WITH A DISABILITY OR REFERS SUCH STUDENT FOR AID, BENEFITS, OR
SERVICES AT A FACILITY NOT OPERATED OR PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER AS A MEANS OF PROVIDING A FREE AND APPROPRIATE
PUBLIC EDUCATION, THE REFERRING LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL
ENSURE THAT THE QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY HAS ADEQUATE
TRANSPORTATION TO AND FROM THE FACILITY WHERE THE AID, BENEFITS, OR
SERVICES ARE PROVIDED. THE TRANSPORTATION MUST BE PROVIDED AT NO
GREATER COST THAN WOULD BE INCURRED BY THE QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH
A DISABILITY OR THEIR PARENT IF THE STUDENT RECEIVED THE AIDS,
BENEFITS, OR SERVICES FROM THE REFERRING LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
PAGE 12-SENATE BILL 26-125

(5) IF IT IS NECESSARY FOR A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY
TO BE PLACED IN A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE RESIDENTIAL FACILITY TO PROVIDE
THE STUDENT WITH A FREE AND APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION, AS
DETERMINED BY A SECTION 504 TEAM OR IEP TEAM, THE PLACEMENT,
INCLUDING NONMEDICAL CARE AND ROOM AND BOARD, SHALL BE PROVIDED
AT NO COST TO THE STUDENT OR THEIR PARENTS OR GUARDIANS.
(6) IF A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER HAS MADE AVAILABLE A FREE
AND APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION TO A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND THE STUDENT'S PARENTS OR
GUARDIANS CHOOSE TO PLACE THE STUDENT IN A PRIVATE SCHOOL, THE
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER IS NOT REQUIRED TO PAY FOR THE STUDENT'S
EDUCATION IN THE PRIVATE SCHOOL.
22-29.5-109. Least restrictive environment - academic settings
- nonacademic settings - comparable facilities.
(1) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE A FREE AND
APPROPRIATE PUBLIC EDUCATION TO EACH QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A
DISABILITY WITHIN ITS JURISDICTION WITH STUDENTS WITHOUT DISABILITIES
TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT APPROPRIATE BASED ON THE NEEDS OF THE
QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY. A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER
SHALL PLACE A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IN THE REGULAR
EDUCATIONAL ENVIRONMENT OPERATED BY THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER UNLESS IT IS DEMONSTRATED THAT THE EDUCATION OF THE
STUDENT IN THAT ENVIRONMENT CANNOT BE ACHIEVED SATISFACTORILY,
EVEN WITH THE USE OF SUPPLEMENTARY AIDS AND SERVICES. WHENEVER A
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER PLACES A STUDENT IN A SETTING OTHER THAN
THE REGULAR EDUCATIONAL ENVIRONMENT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(1), IT SHALL CONSIDER THE PROXIMITY OF THE ALTERNATE SETTING TO THE
STUDENT'S HOME.
(2) IN PROVIDING OR ARRANGING FOR THE PROVISION OF
NONACADEMIC SERVICES AND ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING MEALS, SPECIALS,
RECESS PERIODS, AND EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES, A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER SHALL ENSURE THAT A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY
PARTICIPATES IN SUCH ACTIVITIES AND SERVICES WITH STUDENTS WITHOUT
DISABILITIES TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT APPROPRIATE BASED ON THE NEEDS
OF THE QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY.
PAGE 13-SENATE BILL 26-125

(3) IF A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER, IN COMPLIANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, OPERATES A FACILITY THAT IS
IDENTIFIABLE AS BEING FOR STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES, THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ENSURE THE FACILITY AND THE SERVICES AND
ACTIVITIES PROVIDED THEREIN ARE COMPARABLE TO THE FACILITIES,
SERVICES, AND ACTIVITIES OF THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER.
22-29.5-110. Nonacademic and extracurricular services and
activities - counseling services - physical education - athletics.
(1) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE NONACADEMIC
AND EXTRACURRICULAR SERVICES AND ACTIVITIES IN SUCH AS MANNER AS
IS NECESSARY TO AFFORD A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY AN
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE SERVICES AND ACTIVITIES.
NONACADEMIC AND EXTRACURRICULAR SERVICES AND ACTIVITIES INCLUDE
COUNSELING SERVICES, TRANSPORTATION, HEALTH SERVICES, ATHLETICS,
COURSES, SPECIAL INTEREST GROUPS OR CLUBS, REFERRALS, AND
EMPLOYMENT OF STUDENTS.
(2) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ENSURE THAT A QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IS NOT COUNSELED TOWARD MORE RESTRICTIVE
CAREER OBJECTIVES THAN ARE STUDENTS WITHOUT DISABILITIES WITH
SIMILAR INTERESTS AND ABILITIES.
(3) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER THAT PROVIDES SEPARATE OR
DIFFERENT PHYSICAL EDUCATION AND ATHLETIC ACTIVITIES TO STUDENTS
WITH DISABILITIES MAY DO SO ONLY IF CONSISTENT WITH THE LEAST
RESTRICTIVE ENVIRONMENT REQUIREMENTS IN SECTION 22-29.5-109 AND
ONLY IF A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IS NOT DENIED THE
OPPORTUNITY TO COMPETE FOR ATHLETIC TEAMS OR TO PARTICIPATE IN
ATHLETICS COURSES THAT ARE NOT SEPARATE OR DIFFERENT FROM THOSE
TEAMS OR COURSES OFFERED TO STUDENTS WITHOUT DISABILITIES.
COMPETITIVE OR SELECTIVE PROGRAMS MAY REQUIRE A SELECTION PROCESS
IF THE PROGRAM CRITERIA IS NOT DISCRIMINATORY.
22-29.5-111. Evaluation - consent - procedure - reevaluation.
(1) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MUST TAKE
APPROPRIATE STEPS TO IDENTIFY AND LOCATE EVERY QUALIFIED STUDENT
WITH A DISABILITY WHO RESIDES IN THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S
PAGE 14-SENATE BILL 26-125

JURISDICTION AND WHO IS NOT RECEIVING A PUBLIC EDUCATION AND TAKE
APPROPRIATE STEPS TO NOTIFY THEIR PARENT OF THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER'S DUTY TO IDENTIFY AND LOCATE THE STUDENT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) PRIOR TO EVALUATING A STUDENT UNDER THIS SECTION, A LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL NOTIFY THE STUDENT'S PARENT OF THE
PROPOSED EVALUATION AND OBTAIN CONSENT FROM THE PARENT TO
EVALUATE THE STUDENT.
(3) IF A STUDENT'S PARENT CONSENTS TO AN EVALUATION PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL
CONDUCT AN EVALUATION OF ANY STUDENT WHO IS, OR WHO IS BELIEVED TO
BE, A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY TO DETERMINE IF THE STUDENT
IS A QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY.
(4) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ESTABLISH AND COMPLY
WITH STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR EVALUATIONS THAT ARE
CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION AND SHALL ENSURE
THAT:
(a) TESTS AND OTHER EVALUATION MATERIALS HAVE BEEN
VALIDATED FOR THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE FOR WHICH THEY ARE USED AND ARE
ADMINISTERED BY TRAINED PERSONNEL IN CONFORMANCE WITH THE
INSTRUCTIONS PROVIDED BY THEIR PRODUCER;
(b) TESTS AND OTHER EVALUATION MATERIALS INCLUDE THOSE
CRITERIA TAILORED TO ASSESS SPECIFIC AREAS OF EDUCATIONAL NEED AND
NOT MERELY THOSE WHICH ARE DESIGNED TO PROVIDE A SINGLE GENERAL
INTELLIGENCE QUOTIENT; AND
(c) TESTS ARE SELECTED AND ADMINISTERED TO BEST ENSURE THAT,
WHEN A TEST IS ADMINISTERED TO A STUDENT WITH IMPAIRED SENSORY,
MANUAL, OR SPEAKING SKILLS, THE TEST RESULTS ACCURATELY REFLECT
THE STUDENT'S APTITUDE OR ACHIEVEMENT LEVEL OR OTHER FACTOR THAT
THE TEST PURPORTS TO MEASURE, RATHER THAN REFLECTING THE STUDENT'S
IMPAIRED SENSORY, MANUAL, OR SPEAKING SKILLS, EXCEPT WHERE THOSE
SKILLS ARE THE FACTORS THAT THE TEST PURPORTS TO MEASURE.
(5) IN INTERPRETING EVALUATION DATA AND IN MAKING PLACEMENT
PAGE 15-SENATE BILL 26-125

DECISIONS, A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL:
(a) DRAW UPON INFORMATION FROM A VARIETY OF SOURCES,
INCLUDING APTITUDE AND ACHIEVEMENT TESTS, TEACHER
RECOMMENDATIONS, PHYSICAL CONDITION, SOCIAL OR CULTURAL
BACKGROUND, AND ADAPTIVE BEHAVIOR;
(b) ENSURE THAT INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM ALL SUCH SOURCES
IS DOCUMENTED AND CAREFULLY CONSIDERED;
(c) ENSURE THAT THE ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION AND PLACEMENT
DECISION IS MADE BY A GROUP OF PERSONS THAT ARE KNOWLEDGEABLE
ABOUT THE CHILD, THE MEANING OF THE EVALUATION DATA, AND THE
PLACEMENT OPTIONS; AND
(d) ENSURE THAT THE PLACEMENT DECISION IS MADE IN CONFORMITY
WITH THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE ENVIRONMENT PROVISIONS IN SECTION
22-29.5-109.
(6) FOR STUDENTS IDENTIFIED AS ELIGIBLE PURSUANT TO THIS
ARTICLE 29.5, LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS SHALL CONDUCT
REEVALUATIONS AT LEAST EVERY THREE YEARS. CONSENT FROM A PARENT
IS NOT REQUIRED FOR A REEVALUATION.
(7) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY SATISFY THE EVALUATION
REQUIREMENTS IF:
(a) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER COMPLIES WITH THE
PROCEDURAL REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN SECTION 22-29.5-112; AND
(b) A GROUP OF KNOWLEDGEABLE PEOPLE, BASED ON EXISTING
EVALUATION DATA, DETERMINE THE STUDENT'S ELIGIBILITY AND
PLACEMENT, INCLUDING THE SERVICES AND ACCOMMODATIONS THE
STUDENT NEEDS, AND THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER AND PARENT AGREE.
22-29.5-112. Procedural safeguards.
A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ESTABLISH AND IMPLEMENT,
WITH RESPECT TO ACTIONS REGARDING THE IDENTIFICATION, EVALUATION,
OR EDUCATIONAL PLACEMENT OF A STUDENT WHO MAY HAVE A DISABILITY,
A SYSTEM OF PROCEDURAL SAFEGUARDS THAT INCLUDES NOTICE OF THE
PAGE 16-SENATE BILL 26-125

PROPOSED IDENTIFICATION, EVALUATION DETERMINATION, OR EDUCATIONAL
PLACEMENT DECISION, AN OPPORTUNITY FOR A PARENT OF THE STUDENT TO
EXAMINE RELEVANT RECORDS, AN IMPARTIAL HEARING WITH OPPORTUNITY
FOR PARTICIPATION BY THE STUDENT'S PARENT AND REPRESENTATION BY
LEGAL COUNSEL, AND AN OPPORTUNITY TO APPEAL AN IMPARTIAL HEARING
OUTCOME. COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROCEDURAL SAFEGUARDS OF THE IDEA
IS ONE MEANS OF MEETING THIS REQUIREMENT.
22-29.5-113. Harassment.
(1) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ENSURE THAT A QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY IS FREE FROM HARASSMENT THAT CREATES A
HOSTILE ENVIRONMENT. A "HOSTILE ENVIRONMENT" INCLUDES AN
ENVIRONMENT THAT INTERFERES WITH OR LIMITS THE STUDENT'S ABILITY TO
PARTICIPATE IN OR BENEFIT FROM THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S
SERVICES, ACTIVITIES, OR OPPORTUNITIES.
(2) WHEN A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER KNOWS OR REASONABLY
SHOULD KNOW OF POSSIBLE DISABILITY-BASED HARASSMENT, IT MUST TAKE
IMMEDIATE AND APPROPRIATE ACTION TO INVESTIGATE OR OTHERWISE
DETERMINE WHAT OCCURRED.
(3) IF THE INVESTIGATION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION REVEALS THAT DISABILITY-BASED HARASSMENT IS SUFFICIENTLY
SERIOUS TO CREATE A HOSTILE ENVIRONMENT, THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER MUST TAKE PROMPT AND EFFECTIVE STEPS REASONABLY
CALCULATED TO END THE DISABILITY-BASED HARASSMENT, ELIMINATE THE
HOSTILE ENVIRONMENT, PREVENT HARASSMENT AND A HOSTILE
ENVIRONMENT FROM RECURRING, AND, AS APPROPRIATE, REMEDY THE
HOSTILE ENVIRONMENT'S EFFECTS.
(4) HARASSMENT ON ANY BASIS MAY ALSO IMPACT A QUALIFIED
STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY'S RECEIPT OF A FREE AND APPROPRIATE PUBLIC
EDUCATION, IN WHICH CASE THE EFFECTS OF HARASSMENT, EVEN IF NOT
BASED ON DISABILITY, MUST BE ADDRESSED BY THE STUDENT'S SECTION 504
TEAM OR IEP TEAM.
22-29.5-114. Training - technical assistance - enforcement -
allegation - complaint - dismissal - corrective action - exhaustion of
administrative remedies.
PAGE 17-SENATE BILL 26-125

(1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROVIDE TRAINING AND TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE TO LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS ABOUT THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT HAS THE AUTHORITY TO INVESTIGATE AND
RESOLVE COMPLAINTS OF ALLEGED VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5 AND
THE AUTHORITY TO MONITOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5. THIS ARTICLE 29.5 DOES NOT CREATE NEW
AUTHORITY FOR MATTERS INVOLVING THE IDENTIFICATION, EVALUATION,
PLACEMENT, OR PROVISION OF A FREE EDUCATION PURSUANT TO AN IEP.
(3) A COMPLAINANT MUST ALLEGE VIOLATIONS THAT OCCURRED
WITHIN ONE CALENDAR YEAR BEFORE THE DATE THE COMPLAINT IS FILED
WITH THE DEPARTMENT, OR WITHIN SIXTY DAYS FOLLOWING RESOLUTION OR
TERMINATION OF THE PROCESS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS
SECTION.
(4) THE COLORADO CIVIL RIGHTS DIVISION SHALL NOT HAVE
JURISDICTION OVER ALLEGATIONS OR COMPLAINTS THAT FALL WITHIN THE
SCOPE OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5. THE COLORADO CIVIL RIGHTS DIVISION SHALL
ESTABLISH A SYSTEM TO ENSURE SUCH ALLEGATIONS OR COMPLAINTS ARE
REFERRED TO THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN TEN DAYS OF RECEIVING AN
ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISMISS AN ALLEGATION IN A
COMPLAINT, OR THE ENTIRE COMPLAINT, IF:
(a) (I) THE ALLEGATION, ON ITS FACE OR AS CLARIFIED, FAILS TO
STATE A VIOLATION OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5, WHEN THE ALLEGATION, ON ITS
FACE OR AS CLARIFIED, LACKS SUFFICIENT FACTUAL DETAIL, OR WHEN THE
ALLEGATION IS SO SPECULATIVE, CONCLUSORY, OR INCOHERENT, THAT THE
DEPARTMENT CANNOT REASONABLY INFER THAT A VIOLATION OF THIS
ARTICLE 29.5 OCCURRED OR MAY BE OCCURRING; OR
(II) PRIOR TO DISMISSING AN ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT FOR ONE
OF THE REASONS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY REQUEST FROM THE COMPLAINANT INFORMATION TO
FURTHER ASSESS WHETHER THE ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT SHOULD BE
DISMISSED FOR A REASON SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION. THE COMPLAINANT HAS FOURTEEN DAYS FROM THE DATE OF THE
PAGE 18-SENATE BILL 26-125

DEPARTMENT'S REQUEST TO PROVIDE THE REQUESTED INFORMATION. THE
DEPARTMENT MAY DISMISS AN ALLEGATION OR THE COMPLAINT IF THE
INFORMATION IS NOT RECEIVED WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS OF THE
DEPARTMENT'S REQUEST, IF THE INFORMATION DOES NOT ESTABLISH
JURISDICTION, OR IF THE INFORMATION DOES NOT SUFFICIENTLY ADDRESS
THE FACTORS IN SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IN THE
DEPARTMENT'S DISCRETION.
(b) BASED ON ALL OF THE FACTS PROVIDED BY THE COMPLAINANT,
THE DEPARTMENT CANNOT REASONABLY CONCLUDE THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER HAS VIOLATED THIS ARTICLE 29.5;
(c) THE ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT IS NOT TIMELY FILED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT;
(d) THE COMPLAINT IS FILED AGAINST A PERSON OR ENTITY THAT IS
NOT A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER;
(e) THE DEATH OF THE COMPLAINANT MAKES IT IMPOSSIBLE TO
FULLY INVESTIGATE THE ALLEGATION;
(f) THE DEATH OF THE COMPLAINANT FORECLOSES THE POSSIBILITY
OF INDIVIDUAL RELIEF;
(g) THE SAME OR SIMILAR ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT HAS BEEN
FILED WITH OR IS BEING INVESTIGATED BY ANOTHER AGENCY, INCLUDING
THE DEPARTMENT'S DISPUTE RESOLUTION OFFICE OR THROUGH THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER'S INTERNAL GRIEVANCE PROCESS. A COMPLAINANT
MAY FILE OR REFILE AN ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT WITH THE DEPARTMENT
WITHIN SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE TERMINATION OF THE DEPARTMENT'S
DISPUTE RESOLUTION OFFICE'S PROCESS OR THE LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER'S INTERNAL GRIEVANCE PROCESS. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
REVIEW WHETHER THE OTHER AGENCY'S PROCESS MET ACCEPTABLE LEGAL
STANDARDS OR MAY CHOOSE TO INVESTIGATE ON ITS OWN.
(h) THE SAME OR SIMILAR ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT, BASED ON
THE SAME FACTS, HAS ALREADY BEEN RESOLVED BY THE DEPARTMENT,
ANOTHER AGENCY, OR THROUGH THE DISTRICT'S INTERNAL GRIEVANCE
PROCESS, USING ACCEPTABLE LEGAL STANDARDS;
PAGE 19-SENATE BILL 26-125

(i) THE SAME OR SIMILAR ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT, BASED ON
THE SAME FACTS, HAS ALREADY BEEN FILED IN STATE OR FEDERAL COURT.
IF THE COURT CASE ENDS WITHOUT A DECISION ON THE MERITS OR A
SETTLEMENT, THE COMPLAINT MAY BE FILED OR REFILED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT WITHIN SIXTY DAYS OF THE END OF THE COURT CASE. FOR
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, A DISMISSAL WITH PREJUDICE IS CONSIDERED A
DECISION ON THE MERITS AND A DISMISSAL WITHOUT PREJUDICE IS NOT A
DECISION ON THE MERITS.
(j) THE DEPARTMENT OBTAINS CREDIBLE INFORMATION INDICATING
THAT THE ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT IS RESOLVED AND THEREFORE NO
LONGER APPROPRIATE FOR INVESTIGATION PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 29.5;
(k) A COMPLAINT IS FILED AGAINST A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER
THAT RAISES THE SAME OR SIMILAR ALLEGATION BASED ON THE SAME FACTS
AGAINST THE SAME LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER THAT WAS PREVIOUSLY
DISMISSED OR CLOSED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(l) THE DEPARTMENT RECENTLY INVESTIGATED OR IS CURRENTLY
INVESTIGATING THE SAME OR SIMILAR ALLEGATION BASED ON THE SAME
FACTS INVOLVING THE SAME LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER;
(m) THE COMPLAINANT WITHDRAWS THE COMPLAINT CONTAINING
THE ALLEGATION; OR
(n) THE ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT IS MOOT OR UNRIPE.
(6) (a) THE DEPARTMENT MAY DISMISS AN ALLEGATION OR
COMPLAINT IF:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT'S ABILITY TO COMPLETE AN INVESTIGATION IS
SUBSTANTIALLY IMPAIRED BY THE COMPLAINANT'S REFUSAL TO PROVIDE
INFORMATION THAT IS REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE TO THE COMPLAINANT AND
IS NECESSARY FOR INVESTIGATION OF THE COMPLAINT. THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL INCLUDE DOCUMENTATION IN THE CASE FILE OF ITS EFFORTS TO
CONTACT THE COMPLAINANT BY PHONE, IN WRITING, OR VIA EMAIL TO
REQUEST THE NECESSARY INFORMATION AND OF THE COMPLAINANT'S
REFUSAL TO PROVIDE THE INFORMATION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT'S ABILITY TO COMPLETE AN INVESTIGATION IS
PAGE 20-SENATE BILL 26-125

SUBSTANTIALLY IMPAIRED BY THE COMPLAINANT'S FAILURE TO TIMELY
RESPOND TO THE DEPARTMENT'S COMMUNICATIONS. THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL INCLUDE DOCUMENTATION IN THE CASE FILE OF ITS UNSUCCESSFUL
EFFORTS TO CONTACT THE COMPLAINANT BY PHONE OR IN WRITING TO
REQUEST THE NECESSARY INFORMATION.
(III) THE ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT ALLEGES A VIOLATION FOR
WHICH NO RELIEF IS AVAILABLE.
(b) THE DEPARTMENT HAS THE SOLE DISCRETION TO DETERMINE
WHETHER DISMISSAL CRITERIA ARE MET.
(7) THE DEPARTMENT HAS THE AUTHORITY TO ENFORCE DECISIONS
ISSUED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND REQUIRE A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER TO TAKE CORRECTIVE ACTION IF THERE IS A FINDING OF
NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 29.5. IN DETERMINING WHETHER A
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER HAS COMPLIED WITH THIS ARTICLE 29.5, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY RELY ON INTERPRETATIONS BY FEDERAL COURTS AND
AGENCIES OF SECTION 504 AND THE ADA. A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER
SHALL CORRECT ITS NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 29.5 AS SOON AS
POSSIBLE AND WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME FRAME THAT IS SPECIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT IN AN ORDER.
(8) NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION MAY ADOPT RULES TO ESTABLISH THE DEFINITION OF ANY TERM
NOT SPECIFICALLY DEFINED IN THIS ARTICLE 29.5; UNIFORM AND TIMELY
METHODS OF COMPLAINT RESOLUTION, INCLUDING RULES PROVIDING FOR
THE PROCESS OF FILING A COMPLAINT, WHETHER VOLUNTARY MEDIATION IS
AVAILABLE, OR ANY OTHER RELIEF AVAILABLE PRIOR TO THE CONCLUSION
OF A FINDING OF NONCOMPLIANCE; AND WHETHER WRITTEN CONSENT TO
INVESTIGATE AN ALLEGATION IS REQUIRED. COMPLAINTS MAY BE FILED BY
A PARENT, GUARDIAN, STUDENT, OR THIRD PARTY. A THIRD PARTY MAY
ONLY FILE A COMPLAINT ALLEGING VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5 IF THE
ALLEGATIONS ARE SYSTEMIC IN NATURE OR IF THE COMPLAINT IS ON BEHALF
OF AN INDIVIDUAL STUDENT THE THIRD PARTY IS REPRESENTING AS AN
ATTORNEY OR ADVOCATE. FOR THE COMPLAINT PROCESS, THE TIMELINE
SHALL BE NO LONGER THAN ONE HUNDRED EIGHTY DAYS FROM THE DATE OF
FILING TO THE DATE OF RESOLUTION, WITH THE ABILITY TO PAUSE THE
TIMELINE FOR UP TO SIXTY DAYS PENDING ATTEMPTED RESOLUTION
THROUGH OTHER METHODS, INCLUDING VOLUNTARY MEDIATION.
PAGE 21-SENATE BILL 26-125

(9) (a) IF THE DEPARTMENT IS ACCEPTING COMPLAINTS, A PARENT,
GUARDIAN, STUDENT, OR THIRD PARTY MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE
DEPARTMENT ALLEGING A VIOLATION OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5 ONLY AFTER:
(I) PURSUING RESOLUTION OF THE SAME ALLEGATION THROUGH THE
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S DISABILITY RIGHTS GRIEVANCE PROCESS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 22-29.5-104; AND
(II) (A) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER ISSUES A FINAL DECISION;
OR
(B) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S FINAL DECISION HAS NOT
BEEN PROVIDED TO THE COMPLAINANT WITHIN SIXTY DAYS OF THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER'S RECEIPT OF THE COMPLAINT.
(b) (I) THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (9)(a) OF THIS SECTION
MAY BE WAIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT IF:
(A) THE COMPLAINANT DEMONSTRATES THAT USING THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER'S DISABILITY RIGHTS GRIEVANCE PROCESS WOULD BE
FUTILE OR LIKELY CAUSE IRREPARABLE HARM TO THE STUDENT; OR
(B) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER DOES NOT HAVE A PROMPT
AND EQUITABLE OR READILY AVAILABLE DISABILITY RIGHTS GRIEVANCE
PROCESS.
(II) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5, TO BE CONSIDERED FUTILE,
THE COMPLAINANT MUST SHOW THAT PURSUING RESOLUTION WITH THE
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER WOULD BE POINTLESS OR INEFFECTIVE IN
PROVIDING RELIEF. EXAMPLES WHERE FUTILITY MAY APPLY INCLUDE:
(A) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER LACKS THE AUTHORITY TO
GRANT THE RELIEF SOUGHT;
(B) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S PROCESS IS BIASED OR
UNFAIR, AND THUS UNLIKELY TO RESULT IN A FAIR OUTCOME; HOWEVER, THE
COMPLAINT RECIPIENT AND THE ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY ENTITY BOTH
BEING THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER, ALONE, IS INSUFFICIENT TO
DEMONSTRATE BIAS OR UNFAIRNESS;
PAGE 22-SENATE BILL 26-125

(C) THERE IS A PATTERN OF THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER
FAILING TO RESPOND IN A TIMELY OR APPROPRIATE MANNER TO COMPLAINTS;
OR
(D) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER HAS CLEARLY DEMONSTRATED
UNWILLINGNESS TO COMPLY WITH OR PARTICIPATE IN THE PROCESS IN GOOD
FAITH.
(10) NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE 29.5 SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO AFFECT
ANY ADMINISTRATIVE EXHAUSTION REQUIREMENTS OF FEDERAL LAW,
INCLUDING THE IDEA AND SECTION 504.
(11) NO PUBLIC ENTITY SHALL ASSERT ANY PROVISION OF THIS
ARTICLE 29.5 AS A DEFENSE TO A CLAIM BROUGHT PURSUANT TO FEDERAL
LAW, INCLUDING PURSUANT TO THE IDEA AND SECTION 504.
22-29.5-114.5. Effective date - repeal of part - gifts, grants, and
donations.
(1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY SEEK FUNDING FROM GIFTS, GRANTS,
DONATIONS, AND OTHER AGREEMENTS FOR RESOURCES TO SUPPORT THE
EXECUTION OF THE PROVISIONS OF SECTIONS 22-29.5-114 AND 22-29.5-115.
THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH THIRD PARTIES AND OTHER STATE
AGENCIES TO SUPPORT THE EXECUTION OF THE PROVISIONS OF SECTIONS
22-29.5-114 AND 22-29.5-115.
(2) (a) SECTIONS 22-29.5-114 AND 22-29.5-115 WILL TAKE EFFECT
IF THE DEPARTMENT RECEIVES SUFFICIENT FUNDING OR RESOURCES TO
SUPPORT THE EXECUTION OF THE PROVISIONS OF SECTIONS 22-29.5-114 AND
22-29.5-115. THE COMMISSIONER OF THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE
REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING OF THE DATE WHEN THE CONDITION
SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a) HAS OCCURRED BY EMAILING THE
NOTICE TO REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. SECTIONS 22-29.5-114
AND 22-29.5-115 TAKE EFFECT UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE
THAT THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a) HAS OCCURRED
OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE OF THE
NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
(b) SECTIONS 22-29.5-114, 22-29.5-115, AND THIS SECTION ARE
REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028, IF THE COMMISSIONER OF THE
PAGE 23-SENATE BILL 26-125

DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION HAS NOT NOTIFIED THE REVISOR OF STATUTES
THAT THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) HAS OCCURRED BY
JUNE 30, 2028.
22-29.5-115. Remedies.
(1) IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS A VIOLATION OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5,
IT MAY ORDER:
(a) AN AUDIT OF A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER;
(b) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF CORRECTIVE ACTION PLANS TO BE
FOLLOWED BY THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER;
(c) THAT COMPENSATORY SERVICES OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL
REMEDIAL MEASURES BE PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER TO
THE QUALIFIED STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY;
(d) TRAINING OF THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER'S STAFF;
(e) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER TO ADOPT NEW OR REVISED
POLICIES, PROCEDURES, RULES, AND FORMS;
(f) THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER TO PROVIDE OR REINSTATE
SERVICES OR BENEFITS WRONGFULLY DENIED; AND
(g) ANY OTHER REMEDY NECESSARY, AS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, TO REMEDY VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5 AND
PROSPECTIVELY ENSURE COMPLIANCE.
(2) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY CONTRACTUALLY DELEGATE
ALL COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 29.5 TO ANOTHER LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER. NEITHER LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MAY IMPEDE COMPLIANCE
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5, AND BOTH LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDERS MUST COOPERATE WITH ANY COMPLAINT INVESTIGATION
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 29.5.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY MONITOR A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER'S COMPLIANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT'S ORDER FOR UP TO ONE
YEAR AFTER THE FINDING OF A VIOLATION BY THE DEPARTMENT BY
PAGE 24-SENATE BILL 26-125

REQUIRING THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER TO IMPLEMENT A CORRECTIVE
ACTION PLAN THAT WOULD REMEDY THE VIOLATION.
(4) (a) THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION MAY WITHHOLD STATE
FUNDS FROM A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER IF THE STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION DETERMINES THAT THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER HAS
INTENTIONALLY VIOLATED THIS ARTICLE 29.5 AND DEMONSTRATED AN
UNWILLINGNESS TO ENTER INTO A CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN TO ADDRESS
THE VIOLATION. PRIOR TO INITIATING THE PROCESS TO WITHHOLD FUNDS,
THE STATE BOARD MUST PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER OF THE VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 29.5 AND THE
CORRECTIVE ACTION REQUIRED. THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER MUST BE
GIVEN SIXTY DAYS TO RESPOND TO THE NOTICE. A LOCAL EDUCATION
PROVIDER MAY APPEAL A STATE BOARD DECISION TO WITHHOLD STATE
FUNDS TO THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE COURTS. THE STATE BOARD HAS
THE BURDEN OF PROOF, BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE, TO
ESTABLISH THE BASIS OF THE DECISION BEING APPEALED.
(b) NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE STATE BOARD OF
EDUCATION SHALL ADOPT RULES THAT ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR THE
WITHHOLDING OF FUNDS PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 29.5.
22-29.5-116. Claim preclusion.
(1) IF AN INDIVIDUAL FILES A COMPLAINT WITH THE DEPARTMENT
AND FILES A SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR COMPLAINT BASED ON THE SAME
ALLEGED FACTS WITH THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
OFFICE OF CIVIL RIGHTS OR THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(a) DISMISS THE COMPLAINT IF THE INDIVIDUAL FILED THE
COMPLAINT WITH THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OFFICE
OF CIVIL RIGHTS BEFORE FILING THE COMPLAINT WITH THE DEPARTMENT; OR
(b) NULLIFY, REVOKE, OR VOID ANY FINDINGS MADE OR REMEDIES
PRESCRIBED IF THE INDIVIDUAL FILED THE COMPLAINT WITH THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OFFICE OF CIVIL RIGHTS AFTER THE
RESOLUTION OF THE COMPLAINT WITH THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
PAGE 25-SENATE BILL 26-125

RIGHTS OF INDIVIDUALS TO PURSUE CLAIMS UNDER FEDERAL LAW OR OTHER
STATE LAW.
22-29.5-117. Retaliation.
(1) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL NOT COERCE, INTIMIDATE,
THREATEN, OR DISCRIMINATE AGAINST ANY INDIVIDUAL:
(a) FOR THE PURPOSE OF INTERFERING WITH ANY RIGHT OR PRIVILEGE
SECURED BY THIS ARTICLE 29.5, THE IDEA, SECTION 504, THE ADA, THE
"EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN'S EDUCATIONAL ACT", ARTICLE 20 OF THIS TITLE
22, OR THE "PROTECTION OF STUDENTS FROM RESTRAINT AND SECLUSION
ACT", ARTICLE 15.5 OF THIS TITLE 22;
(b) BECAUSE AN INDIVIDUAL MAKES OR HAS MADE, OR BECAUSE A
LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER BELIEVES AN INDIVIDUAL HAS MADE OR WILL
MAKE, A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS ARTICLE 29.5, THE IDEA, THE ADA, THE
"EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN'S EDUCATIONAL ACT", ARTICLE 20 OF THIS TITLE
22, OR THE "PROTECTION OF STUDENTS FROM RESTRAINT AND SECLUSION
ACT", ARTICLE 15.5 OF THIS TITLE 22; OR
(c) BECAUSE AN INDIVIDUAL TESTIFIES, ASSISTS, OR PARTICIPATES
IN ANY MANNER IN AN INVESTIGATION OR PROCEEDING REGARDING AN
ALLEGATION OR COMPLAINT PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 29.5, THE IDEA,
THE ADA, THE "EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN'S EDUCATIONAL ACT", ARTICLE
20 OF THIS TITLE 22, OR THE "PROTECTION OF STUDENTS FROM RESTRAINT
AND SECLUSION ACT", ARTICLE 15.5 OF THIS TITLE 22.
(2) ALLEGATIONS OF COERCION, INTIMIDATION, THREATS,
DISCRIMINATION, OR OTHER RETALIATION AS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION
AGAINST ANY INDIVIDUAL MAY BE FILED WITH THE DEPARTMENT, AND THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PROCESS AND EVALUATE SUCH ALLEGATIONS PURSUANT
TO THIS ARTICLE 29.5.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 26-SENATE BILL 26-125

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 27-SENATE BILL 26-125